Delaware, session 153, HB124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Three-fifths of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Â§ 6612, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 6612. State Fire Marshal â Term, salary, duties, powers and responsibilities. (5) The State Fire Marshal, with the approval of the State Fire Prevention Commission, where such regulations or amendments duly promulgated under the authority of the State Fire Prevention Commission require the issuing of a permit, license or certificate, is authorized to issue such permits, licenses or certificates and to establish a schedule of fees not to exceed the following schedule: b. A maximum of $50 $100 for a license to service portable unit fire suppression appliances. c. A maximum of $25 $100 for all other permits, licenses and certifications as required in the State Fire Prevention Regulations.